Washington statutes.
RCW 19.310.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) A person or entity "affiliated" with a specific person or entity, means a person or entity who directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with, the person or entity specified.

(2) "Client" means the taxpayer with whom the exchange facilitator enters into an agreement as described in subsection (4)(a)(i) of this section.

(3) "Covered dishonest act" means a crime involving fraud, embezzlement, misappropriation of funds, robbery, or other theft of property.

(4)(a) "Exchange facilitator" means a person who:

(i)(A) Facilitates, for a fee, an exchange of like-kind property by entering into an agreement with a taxpayer by which the exchange facilitator acquires from the taxpayer the contractual rights to sell the taxpayer's relinquished property located in this state and transfer a replacement property to the taxpayer as a qualified intermediary, as defined under treasury regulation section 1.1031(k)-1(g)(4); (B) enters into an agreement with a taxpayer to take title to a property in this state as an exchange accommodation titleholder, as defined in internal revenue service revenue procedure 2000-37; or (C) enters into an agreement with a taxpayer to act as a qualified trustee or qualified escrow holder, as both terms are defined under treasury regulation section 1.1031(k)-1(g)(3); or

(ii) Maintains an office in this state for the purpose of soliciting business as an exchange facilitator.

(b) "Exchange facilitator" does not include:

(i) A taxpayer or a disqualified person, as defined under treasury regulation section 1.1031(k)-1(k), seeking to qualify for the nonrecognition provisions of section 1031 of the internal revenue code of 1986, as amended;

(ii) A financial institution that is (A) acting as a depository for exchange funds and is not facilitating an exchange or (B) acting solely as a qualified escrow holder or qualified trustee, as both terms are defined under treasury regulation section 1.1031(k)-1(g)(3), and is not facilitating an exchange;

(iii) A title insurance company, underwritten title company, or escrow company that is acting solely as a qualified escrow holder or qualified trustee, as both terms are defined under treasury regulation section 1.1031(k)-1(g)(3), and is not facilitating an exchange;

(iv) A person that advertises for and teaches seminars or classes, or otherwise makes a presentation, to attorneys, accountants, real estate professionals, tax professionals, or other professionals, when the primary purpose is to teach the professionals about tax-deferred exchanges or to train them to act as exchange facilitators;

(v) A qualified intermediary, as defined under treasury regulation section 1.1031(k)-1(g)(4), who holds exchange funds from the disposition of relinquished property located outside of this state; or

(vi) An affiliated entity that is used by the exchange facilitator to facilitate exchanges or to take title to property in this state as an exchange accommodation titleholder.

(c) For the purposes of this subsection, "fee" means compensation of any nature, direct or indirect, monetary or in kind, that is received by a person or related person, as defined in section 267(b) or 707(b) of the internal revenue code, for any services relating to or incidental to the exchange of like-kind property.

(5) "Financial institution" means a state chartered or federally chartered bank, credit union, savings and loan association, savings bank, or trust company whose accounts are insured by the full faith and credit of the United States, the federal deposit insurance corporation, the national credit union share insurance fund, or other similar or successor programs.

(6) "Person" means an individual, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, association, joint stock company, trust, or any other form of a legal entity, and includes the agents and employees of that person.

(7) "Prudent investor standard" means the standard for investment as described under RCW 11.100.020.

[ 2013 c 228 s 1; 2009 c 70 s 2.]